es: Material de la mascarilla facial: Acero al carbono; No incluido; Plástico; Policarbonato; Acero inoxidable; Acero; Titanio; Otro
tr: Yüz maskesi malzemesi: Karbon çeliği; Dahil değil; Plastik; Polikarbonat; Paslanmaz çelik; Çelik; Titanyum; Diğer
zh-TW: 面罩材質: 碳鋼; 不含; 塑膠; 聚碳酸酯; 不鏽鋼; 鋼; 鈦; 其他
sv: Ansiktsmaskens material: Kolstål; Ingår ej; Plast; Polykarbonat; Rostfritt stål; Stål; Titan; Övrigt
fr: Matériau du masque facial: Acier au carbone; Non inclus; Plastique; Polycarbonate; Acier inoxydable; Acier; Titane; Autre
ru: Материал маски: Углеродистая сталь; Не входит в комплект; Пластик; Поликарбонат; Нержавеющая сталь; Сталь; Титан; Другое
cs: Materiál roušky: Uhlíková ocel; Není součástí; Plast; Polykarbonát; Nerezová ocel; Ocel; Titan; Jiné
pl: Materiał maseczki: Stal węglowa; Brak w zestawie; Plastik; Poliwęglan; Stal nierdzewna; Stal; Tytan; Inny
fi: Kangasnaamion materiaali: Hiiliteräs; Ei sisälly; Muovi; Polykarbonaatti; Ruostumaton teräs; Teräs; Titaani; Muu
zh-CN: 面罩材质: 碳钢; 未包含; 塑料; 聚碳酸酯; 不锈钢; 钢; 钛; 其他
hu: Arcmaszk anyaga: Szénacél; Nincs mellékelve; Műanyag; Polycarbonate; Rozsdamentes acél; Acél; Titán; Egyéb
vi: Chất liệu khẩu trang: Thép carbon; Không bao gồm; Nhựa; Polycarbonate; Thép không gỉ; Thép; Titan; Khác
ko: 페이스 마스크 소재: 탄소강; 포함되지 않음; 플라스틱; 폴리카보네이트; 스테인리스 스틸; 강철; 티타늄; 기타
sl-SI: Material maske za obraz: Ogljikovo jeklo; Ni vključeno; Plastika; Polikarbonat; Nerjavno jeklo; Jeklo; Titan; Drugo
da: Ansigtsmaskemateriale: Kulstofstål; Medfølger ikke; Plastik; Polykarbonat; Rustfrit stål; Stål; Titanium; Andet
en: Face mask material: Carbon steel; Not included; Plastic; Polycarbonate; Stainless steel; Steel; Titanium; Other
it: Materiale della mascherina: Acciaio al carbonio; Non incluso; Plastica; Policarbonato; Acciaio inossidabile; Acciaio; Titanio; Altro
sk-SK: Materiál pleťovej masky: Uhlíková oceľ; Nie je súčasťou; Plast; Polykarbonát; Nehrdzavejúca oceľ; Oceľ; Titán; Iný
lt-LT: Veido kaukės medžiaga: Anglinis plienas; Neįtraukta; Plastikas; Polikarbonatas; Nerūdijantis plienas; Plienas; Titanas; Kitas
pt-PT: Material da viseira: Aço carbono; Não incluído; Plástico; Policarbonato; Aço inoxidável; Aço; Titânio; Outro
hr-HR: Materijal maske za lice: Ugljični čelik; Nije uključeno; Plastika; Polikarbonat; Nehrđajući čelik; Čelik; Titanij; Ostalo
de: Gesichtsmaskenmaterial: Kohlenstoffstahl; Nicht inbegriffen; Kunststoff; Polycarbonat; Edelstahl; Stahl; Titan; Sonstiges
pt-BR: Material da máscara facial: Aço carbono; Não incluído; Plástico; Policarbonato; Aço inoxidável; Aço; Titânio; Outros
nl: Materiaal gezichtsmasker: Koolstofstaal; Niet inbegrepen; Plastic; Polycarbonaat; Roestvrij staal; Staal; Titanium; Overig
ja: フェイスマスク素材: 炭素鋼; 含まれていない; プラスチック; ポリカーボネート; ステンレス; スチール; チタン; その他
th: วัสดุสำหรับทำหน้ากากผ้า: เหล็กกล้าคาร์บอน; ไม่รวมในชุด; พลาสติก; โพลิคาร์บอเนต; สเตนเลสสตีล; เหล็กกล้า; ไทเทเนียม; อื่นๆ
bg-BG: Материал на маската за лице: Въглеродна стомана; Не е включено; Пластмаса; Поликарбонат; Неръждаема стомана; Стомана; Титан; Друго
el: Υλικό μάσκας προσώπου: Ανθρακούχος χάλυβας; Δεν περιλαμβάνεται; Πλαστικό; Πολυκαρβονικό; Ανοξείδωτος χάλυβας; Χάλυβας; Τιτάνιο; Άλλο
ro-RO: Materialul măștii de față: Oțel carbon; Nu este inclus; Plastic; Policarbonat; Oțel inoxidabil; Oțel; Titan; Altele
nb: Materiale i ansiktsmaske: Karbonstål; Ikke inkludert; Plast; Polykarbonat; Rustfritt stål; Stål; Titan; Annet